Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-214 Notice to insured regarding
conversion right. If any individual insured under a group life insurance
policy delivered in this State becomes entitled under the terms of the policy
to have an individual policy of life insurance issued to the individual without
evidence of insurability, subject to making of application and payment of the
first premium within the period specified in the policy, and if the individual
is not given notice of the existence of such right at least fifteen days prior
to the expiration date of such period, then, in such event the individual shall
have an additional period within which to exercise the right, but nothing
herein shall be construed to continue any insurance beyond the period provided
in the policy. This additional period shall expire fifteen days next after the
individual is given such notice but in no event shall the additional period
extend beyond sixty days next after the expiration date of the period provided
in the policy. Written notice presented to the individual or mailed by the
policyholder to the last known address of the individual or mailed by the
insurer to the last known address of the individual as furnished by the
policyholder shall constitute notice for the purposes of this section. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next